Illinois, session 104th, HB2438.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5.12f as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.12f)7    Sec. 5-5.12f. Prescription drugs for mental illness; no 8utilization or prior approval mandates. 9    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code to 10the contrary, except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), 11for the purpose of removing barriers to the timely treatment 12of serious mental illnesses, prior authorization mandates and 13utilization management controls shall not be imposed under the 14fee-for-service and managed care medical assistance programs 15on any FDA-approved prescription drug that is recognized by a 16generally accepted standard medical reference as effective in 17the treatment of conditions specified in the most recent 18Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders 19published by the American Psychiatric Association if a 20preferred or non-preferred drug is prescribed to an adult 21patient to treat serious mental illness and during the 22preceding 60 days, the patient who experienced an inadequate 23response was prescribed and unsuccessfully treated with a   HB2438- 2 -LRB104 04068 KTG 14092 b114-day treatment trial of a drug for the same clinical 2condition that is included on the preferred drug list. one of 3the following applies:4        (1) the patient has changed providers, including, but 5    not limited to, a change from an inpatient to an 6    outpatient provider, and is stable on the drug that has 7    been previously prescribed, and received prior 8    authorization, if required;9        (2) the patient has changed insurance coverage and is 10    stable on the drug that has been previously prescribed and 11    received prior authorization under the previous source of 12    coverage; or13        (3) subject to federal law on maximum dosage limits 14    and safety edits adopted by the Department's Drug and 15    Therapeutics Board, including those safety edits and 16    limits needed to comply with federal requirements 17    contained in 42 CFR 456.703, the patient has previously 18    been prescribed and obtained prior authorization for the 19    drug and the prescription modifies the dosage, dosage 20    frequency, or both, of the drug as part of the same 21    treatment for which the drug was previously prescribed. 22    (b) The following safety edits shall be permitted for 23prescription drugs covered under this Section:24        (1) clinically appropriate drug utilization review 25    (DUR) edits, including, but not limited to, drug-to-drug, 26    drug-age, and drug-dose;  HB2438- 3 -LRB104 04068 KTG 14092 b1        (2) generic drug substitution if a generic drug is 2    available for the prescribed medication in the same dosage 3    and formulation; and4        (3) any utilization management control that is 5    necessary for the Department to comply with any current 6    consent decrees or federal waivers. 7    (c) As used in this Section, "serious mental illness" 8means any one or more of the following diagnoses and 9International Classification of Diseases, Tenth Revision, 10Clinical Modification (ICD-10-CM) codes listed by the 11Department of Human Services' Division of Mental Health, as 12amended, on its official website: 13        (1) Delusional Disorder (F22)14        (2) Brief Psychotic Disorder (F23)15        (3) Schizophreniform Disorder (F20.81)16        (4) Schizophrenia (F20.9)17        (5) Schizoaffective Disorder (F25.x)18        (6) Catatonia Associated with Another Mental Disorder 19    (Catatonia Specifier) (F06.1)20        (7) Other Specified Schizophrenia Spectrum and Other 21    Psychotic Disorder (F28)22        (8) Unspecified Schizophrenia Spectrum and Other 23    Psychotic Disorder (F29)24        (9) Bipolar I Disorder (F31.xx)25        (10) Bipolar II Disorder (F31.81)26        (11) Cyclothymic Disorder (F34.0)  HB2438- 4 -LRB104 04068 KTG 14092 b1        (12) Unspecified Bipolar and Related Disorder (F31.9)2        (13) Disruptive Mood Dysregulation Disorder (F34.8)3        (14) Major Depressive Disorder Single episode (F32.xx)4        (15) Major Depressive Disorder, Recurrent episode 5    (F33.xx)6        (16) Obsessive-Compulsive Disorder (F42)7        (17) Posttraumatic Stress Disorder (F43.10)8        (18) Anorexia Nervosa (F50.0x)9        (19) Bulimia Nervosa (F50.2)10        (20) Postpartum Depression (F53.0)11        (21) Puerperal Psychosis (F53.1)12        (22) Factitious Disorder Imposed on Another (F68.A)13    (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, nothing in 14this Section shall not be construed to conflict with Section 151927(a)(1) and (b)(1)(A) of the federal Social Security Act 16and any implementing regulations and agreements. 17(Source: P.A. 103-593, eff. 6-7-24.)